Utah statutes.
65A-1-10.   Proprietary geologic or financial information -- Confidentiality -- Division to adopt rules.

(1)  The division may keep geologic and financial information, which the provider and the division agree is of a proprietary nature, confidential unless the information is required by federal or state law to be of a nonproprietary nature.

(2)  The division shall adopt rules to determine when to accept confidential information.



Amended by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

